Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-822
Domestic health and accident associations; deposit; use; restoration.

The deposit required in section 44-821 shall be used only for the payment of indemnities provided in policies issued by the depositor, and only upon a showing of necessity therefor made to the Department of Insurance, and after the approval thereof by the department. Such deposit shall be restored within such time and under such conditions as the department may direct by order.

Laws 1941, c. 89, § 2, p. 342;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-808;

R.S.1943, § 44-822.